fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie: Accessoires pour imprimantes 3D; Pièces de rechange pour imprimante 3D; Imprimantes 3D; Accessoires pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs; Imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs; Accessoires pour scanner; Scanners
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機: 3D 印表機配件; 3D 印表機替換零件; 3D 印表機; 印表機/影印機/傳真機配件; 印表機/影印機/傳真機; 掃描器配件; 掃描器
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax: Accessori per stampanti 3D; Parti di ricambio della stampante 3D; Stampanti 3D; Accessori per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax; Stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax; Accessori per scanner; Scanner
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс: Аксесоари за 3D принтер; Резервни части за 3D принтер; 3D принтери; Аксесоари за принтери, копирни машини и факс машини; Принтери, копирни и факс машини; Аксесоари за скенери; Скенери
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์: อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; ชิ้นส่วนทดแทนเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; เครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์; เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และเครื่องแฟกซ์; อุปกรณ์เครื่องสแกน; สแกนเนอร์
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax: Acessórios para impressoras 3D; Peças de reposição para impressora 3D; Impressoras 3D; Acessórios de máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras; Impressoras, copiadoras, scanners e fax; Acessórios para scanner; Scanners
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen: Accessoires voor 3D-printers; 3d-printer reserveonderdelen; 3D-printers; Accessoires voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines; Printers, kopieer- en faxapparaten; Scanneraccessoires; Scanners
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax: Tilbehør til 3D-printere; 3D-printer – reservedele; 3D-printere; Tilbehør til printer, kopimaskine og fax; Printere, kopimaskiner og faxmaskiner; Scanner – tilbehør; Scannere
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování: Příslušenství k 3D tiskárnám; Náhradní díly 3D tiskáren; 3D tiskárny; Příslušenství k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům; Tiskárny, kopírky a faxy; Skenery – příslušenství; Skenery
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje: Dodaci za 3D pisače; Zamjenski dijelovi za 3D pisač; 3D pisači; Dodaci za pisače, fotokopirne i faks uređaje; Pisači, fotokopirni uređaji i faks uređaji; Dodaci za skener; Skeneri
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora: Accesorios para impresoras 3D; Partes de repuesto de impresora 3D; Impresoras 3D; Accesorios para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras; Impresoras, fotocopiadoras y faxes; Accesorios para escáner; Escáneres
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen: 3D-Drucker-Zubehör; 3D-Drucker-Ersatzteile; 3D-Drucker; Zubehör für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte; Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte; Scannerzubehör; Scanner
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами: Аксессуары для 3D-принтеров; Запасные части для 3D-принтеров; 3D-принтеры; Аксессуары для принтеров, копиров и факсов; Принтеры, копиры и факсы; Аксессуары для сканеров; Сканеры
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ: Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών 3D; Ανταλλακτικά 3D εκτυπωτή; Εκτυπωτές 3D; Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ; Εκτυπωτές, φωτοαντιγραφικά & φαξ; Αξεσουάρ σαρωτή; Σαρωτές
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje: Dodatki za 3D tiskalnike; Nadomestni deli za 3D tiskalnike; 3D tiskalniki; Dodatki za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse; Tiskalniki, kopirni stroji in faksi; Dodatki za optični bralnik; Optični bralniki
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie: Príslušenstvo k 3D tlačiarňam; Náhradné diely 3D tlačiarní; 3D tlačiarne; Príslušenstvo k tlačiarňam, kopírkam a faxom; Tlačiarne, kopírky a faxy; Príslušenstvo pre skenery; Skenery
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus: 3D-tulostimen lisätarvikkeet; 3D-tulostimen varaosa; 3D-tulostimet; Tulostinten, kopiokoneiden ja faksien lisätarvikkeet; Tulostimet, kopiokoneet ja faksit; Skannerin lisätarvikkeet; Skannerit
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas: 3D spausdintuvų priedai; 3D spausdintuvo pakaitinės dalys; 3D spausdintuvai; Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų priedai; Spausdintuvai, kopijavimo aparatai ir fakso aparatai; Skaitytuvų priedai; Skaitytuvai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax: Phụ kiện máy in 3D; Linh kiện thay thế máy in 3D; Máy in 3D; Phụ kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax; Máy in, photocopy & fax; Phụ kiện máy quét; Máy quét
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks: 3D-skrivertilbehør; Reservedeler til 3D-skrivere; 3D-skrivere; Tilbehør til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner; Skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner; Skannertilbehør; Skannere
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás: 3D-nyomtató-kiegészítők; 3D-nyomtató cserealkatrészek; 3D nyomtatók; Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-kiegészítők; Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgépek; Szkennerkiegészítők; Szkennerek
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks: 3D Yazıcı Aksesuarları; 3D Yazıcı Yedek Parçaları; 3B Yazıcılar; Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Aksesuarları; Yazıcılar, Fotokopi ve Faks Makineleri; Tarayıcı Aksesuarları; Tarayıcılar
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax: 3D Printer Accessories; 3D Printer Replacement Parts; 3D Printers; Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories; Printers, Copiers & Fax Machines; Scanner Accessories; Scanners
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax: Accesorii pentru imprimante 3D; Piese de schimb pentru imprimante 3D; Imprimante 3D; Accesorii pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri; Imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri; Accesorii scanere; Scanere
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax: Acessórios de impressora 3D; Peças de substituição de impressora 3D; Impressoras 3D; Acessórios de impressora, copiadora e fax; Impressoras, copiadoras e fax; Acessórios de leitor; Leitores
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie: Akcesoria do drukarek 3D; Części zamienne do drukarek 3D; Drukarki 3D; Akcesoria do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów; Drukarki, kopiarki i faksy; Akcesoria do skanerów; Skanery
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스: 3D 프린터 부대용품; 3D 프린터 교체 부품; 3D 프린터; 프린터/복사기/팩스 부대용품; 프린터/복사기/팩스; 스캐너 부대용품; 스캐너
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機: 3Dプリンター関連用品; 3Dプリンター交換部品; 3Dプリンター; プリンター・コピー機関連用品; プリンター、コピー機、ファックス; スキャナー関連用品; スキャナー
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真: 3D 打印机配件; 3D 打印机替换部件; 3D 打印机; 打印机、复印机和传真机配件; 打印机、复印机和传真机; 扫描仪配件; 扫描仪
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax: Tillbehör för 3D-skrivare; 3D-skrivarersättningsdelar; 3D-skrivare; Tillbehör till skrivare, kopiator och fax; Skrivare, kopiatorer och faxar; Skannertillbehör; Skannrar